Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-183
Property not eligible for renewal and maintenance funds.

No building held in trust, property of the Board of Educational Lands and Funds, nor highways or roads and revenue bond structures shall receive funds for renewal and maintenance under sections 81-173 to 81-190.

Laws 1977, LB 309, § 11.